Utah statutes.
59-22-202.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Adjusted for inflation" means increased in accordance with the formula
for inflation adjustment set forth in Exhibit C to the Master Settlement
Agreement.
(2)  "Affiliate" means a person who directly or indirectly owns or controls,
is owned or controlled by, or is under common ownership or control with,
another person.  Solely for purposes of this definition, the terms "owns," "is
owned" and "ownership" mean ownership of an equity interest, or the equivalent
thereof, of 10% or more, and the term "person" means an individual,
partnership, committee, association, corporation or any other organization or
group of persons.
(3)  "Allocable share" means Allocable Share as that term is defined in the
Master Settlement Agreement.
(4)  "Cigarette" means any product that contains nicotine, is intended to be
burned or heated under ordinary conditions of use, and consists of or contains
(a) any roll of tobacco wrapped in paper or in any substance not containing
tobacco; or (b) tobacco, in any form, that is functional in the product,
which, because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used in the filler, or
its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to, or purchased by,
consumers as a cigarette; or (c) any roll of tobacco wrapped in any substance
containing tobacco which, because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used
in the filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to, or
purchased by, consumers as a cigarette described in clause (a) of this
definition.  The term "cigarette" includes "roll-your-own" (i.e., any tobacco
which, because of its appearance, type, packaging, or labeling is suitable for
use and likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers as tobacco for
making cigarettes).  For purposes of this definition of "cigarette," 0.09
ounces of "roll-your-own" tobacco shall constitute one individual "cigarette."
(5)  "Master Settlement Agreement" means the settlement agreement (and related
documents) entered into on November 23, 1998, by the State and leading United
States tobacco product manufacturers.
(6)  "Qualified escrow fund" means an escrow arrangement with a federally or
State chartered financial institution having no affiliation with any tobacco
product manufacturer and having assets of at least $1,000,000,000 where such
arrangement requires that such financial institution hold the escrowed funds'
principal for the benefit of releasing parties and prohibits the tobacco
product manufacturer placing the funds into escrow from using, accessing, or
directing the use of the funds' principal except as consistent with Subsection
59-22-203(2).
(7)  "Released claims" means Released Claims as that term is defined in the
Master Settlement Agreement.
(8)  "Releasing parties" means Releasing Parties as that term is defined in
the Master Settlement Agreement.
(9) (a)  "Tobacco product manufacturer" means an entity that after the date of
enactment of this Act directly (and not exclusively through any affiliate):
(i)  manufactures cigarettes anywhere that such manufacturer intends to be
sold in the United States, including cigarettes intended to be sold in the
United States through an importer (except where such importer is an original
participating manufacturer (as that term is defined in the Master Settlement
Agreement) that will be responsible for the payments under the Master
Settlement Agreement with respect to such cigarettes as a result of the
provisions of Subsection II(mm) of the Master Settlement Agreement and that
pays the taxes specified in Subsection II(z) of the Master Settlement
Agreement, and provided that the manufacturer of such cigarettes does not
market or advertise such cigarettes in the United States);
(ii)  is the first purchaser anywhere for resale in the United States of
cigarettes manufactured anywhere that the manufacturer does not intend to be
sold in the United States; or
(iii)  becomes a successor of an entity described in Subsection (9)(a)(i) or
(ii).
(b) "Tobacco product manufacturer" shall not include an affiliate of a tobacco
product manufacturer unless such affiliate itself falls within any Subsection
(9)(a)(i) through (iii).
(10)  "Units sold" means the number of individual cigarettes sold in the State
by the applicable tobacco product manufacturer (whether directly or through a
distributor, retailer or similar intermediary or intermediaries) during the
year in question, as measured by excise taxes collected by the State on packs
(or "roll-your-own" tobacco containers).  The State Tax Commission shall
promulgate such regulations as are necessary to ascertain the amount of State
excise tax paid on the cigarettes of such tobacco product manufacturer for
each year.
